Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2403
Goods or services; payment in full; when required.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each agency shall make payment in full for all goods delivered or services rendered on or before the forty-fifth calendar day after (a) the date of receipt by the agency of the goods or services or (b) the date of receipt by the agency of the bill for the goods or services, whichever is later, unless other provisions for payment are agreed to in writing by the creditor and the agency.

(2) Any agency making payment for goods or services provided for third parties shall make payment in full for such goods or services on or before the sixtieth calendar day after the date of receipt by the agency of the bill.

(3) No goods or services shall be deemed to be received by an agency until all such goods or services are completely delivered and finally accepted by the agency. For purposes of determining whether payment was made in accordance with this section, payment in full by an agency shall be considered to be made on the date the warrant or check for such payment was mailed or otherwise transmitted.

Laws 1988, LB 1079, § 3.